Hawaii statutes.
§187A-22 Use of adjoining lands. No
person who has bought any government land, or obtains the land by lease or
other title, has or shall have greater right than any other person over any
fishing ground not included in the title, although adjacent to the land. [L
1985, c 94, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next